Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1373.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1605.1(a), (b)(2) and (4) and (c) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, are amended to read:Section 1605.1. Assessment of Civic Knowledge.--(a) Beginning with the [2020-2021] 2026-2027 school year, each school entity:(1) Shall administer at least once to students during grades seven through twelve [a locally developed assessment of United States history, government and civics that includes the nature, purpose, principles and structure of United States constitutional democracy, the principles, operations and documents of United States government and the rights and 1234567891011121314151617181920 responsibilities of citizenship. Each school entity shall determine the form of the assessment and the manner in which the assessment shall be administered and may administer the assessment at the conclusion of the course of study required under section 1605(a) or at the conclusion of another related course or instructional unit. A school entity may use] the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services Test [to satisfy the requirements of this paragraph]. A student must receive a score of at least sixty percent (60%) as a condition of high school graduation. A student may take the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services Test as many times as necessary to achieve a score of at least sixty percent (60%).(2) Shall issue a certificate of recognition, developed by the department, to students who achieve a perfect score on the [assessment administered] United States Citizenship and Immigration Services Test under paragraph (1).(b) The department shall:* * *(2) Conduct an electronic survey of each school entity at the conclusion of the [2020-2021] 2026-2027 school year and at the conclusion of every second school year thereafter requesting information concerning compliance with the requirements of this section. Each school entity shall respond to the survey no later than November 30 following the school year for which the survey is conducted. The survey shall only request the following information for the immediately preceding school year:[(i) The type of the assessment administered as required under subsection (a)(1).](ii) The total number of students who took the [assessment] United States Citizenship and Immigration Services Test.20250HB1373PN1569 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) The total number of students who attained a passing grade on the [assessment] United States Citizenship and Immigration Services Test.(iv) The grade level or levels in which the [assessment] United States Citizenship and Immigration Services Test was administered.(v) The course or courses in which the [assessment] United States Citizenship and Immigration Services Test was administered.* * *(4) Develop a certificate of recognition for a student who achieves a perfect score on the [assessment] United States Citizenship and Immigration Services Test under subsection (a)(1) and make the certificate available on the department's publicly accessible Internet website for use by a school entity.(c) A student with an individualized education program shall not be required to take the [assessment] United States Citizenship and Immigration Services Test administered under subsection (a)(1) if the provisions of the student's individualized education program indicate otherwise.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1373PN1569 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122